District of Columbia statutes.
2-1402.23

Acts of discrimination by broker or salesperson.

Any real estate broker or real estate salesperson who commits any act of discrimination prohibited under the provisions of this chapter, if such act or the property involved is within the District of Columbia, or if such act occurs outside of the District of Columbia, in a place where such act is prohibited by state or local law, ordinance or regulation, without regard to location of the property, shall be considered by the Real Estate Commission, for the purposes of Chapter 17 of Title 42, as having endangered the public interest; and shall be subject to the procedures set forth in § 2-1403.17.

History

Dec. 13, 1977, D.C. Law 2-38, title II, § 223, 24 DCR 6038
Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-209, § 35(a)(2), 30 DCR 390

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2517.
1973 Ed., § 6-2233.